Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.120

Funding or refunding bonds—Bonds not general obligation.

Such funding or refunding bonds shall not be a general indebtedness of the city or town, but shall be payable solely from a special fund created therefor by ordinance. Each bond shall state upon its face that it is payable from a special fund, naming the fund and the ordinance creating it.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.92.120. Prior: 1935 c 81 s 2; RRS s 9492-2. Formerly RCW 80.40.120.]